sk-SK: Zliatina činelov: Bronz B10; Bronz B12; Bronz B15; Bronz B20; Bronz B8; Mosadz; Bronz (nešpecifikovaný); Alpaka (niklové striebro); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
pt-BR: Liga do címbalo/prato: Bronze B10; Bronze B12; Bronze B15; Bronze B20; Bronze B8; Latão; Bronze (não especificado); Prata de níquel; Aço inoxidável; Outros
fi: Symbaalin metalliseos: B10-pronssi; B12-pronssi; B15-pronssi; B20-pronssi; B8-pronssi; Messinki; Pronssi (määrittelemätön); Uushopea; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
hr-HR: Legura činele: B10 bronca; B12 bronca; B15 bronca; B20 bronca; B8 bronca; Mjed; Bronca (neodređeno); Novo srebro; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
el: Κράμα κυμβάλων: Μπρούντζος B10; Μπρούντζος B12; Μπρούντζος B15; Μπρούντζος B20; Μπρούντζος B8; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούντζος (μη καθορισμένος); Νέαργυρος; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
es: Aleación del platillo: Bronce B10; Bronce B12; Bronce B15; Bronce B20; Bronce B8; Latón; Bronce (sin especificar); Alpaca; Acero inoxidable; Otro
lt-LT: Lėkštės lydinys: B10 bronza; B12 bronza; B15 bronza; B20 bronza; B8 bronza; Žalvaris; Bronza (nenurodyta); Naujasidabris; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
pt-PT: Liga de pratos: Bronze B10; Bronze B12; Bronze B15; Bronze B20; Bronze B8; Latão; Bronze (não especificado); Prata-níquel; Aço inoxidável; Outra
ro-RO: Aliaj de cinele: Bronz B10; Bronz B12; Bronz B15; Bronz B20; Bronz B8; Alamă; Bronz (nespecificat); Alpaca; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
pl: Stop talerza perkusyjnego: Brąz B10; Brąz B12; Brąz B15; Brąz B20; Brąz B8; Mosiądz; Brąz (nieokreślony); Nowe srebro; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
it: Lega per piatti: Bronzo B10; Bronzo B12; Bronzo B15; Bronzo B20; Bronzo B8; Ottone; Bronzo (non specificato); Alpacca; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
fr: Alliage de la cymbale: Bronze B10; Bronze B12; Bronze B15; Bronze B20; Bronze B8; Laiton; Bronze (non spécifié); Maillechort; Acier inoxydable; Autre
nl: Bekken legering: B10-brons; B12-brons; B15-brons; B20-brons; B8-brons; Messing; Brons (ongespecificeerd); Nieuwzilver; Roestvrij staal; Overig
ja: シンバル合金: B10ブロンズ; B12ブロンズ; B15ブロンズ; B20ブロンズ; B8ブロンズ; ブラス; ブロンズ (未指定); 洋白; ステンレススチール; その他
da: Bækkenlegering: B10-bronze; B12-bronze; B15-bronze; B20-bronze; B8-bronze; Messing; Bronze (uspecificeret); Nysølv; Rustfrit stål; Andet
hu: Cintányér-ötvözet: B10 bronz; B12 bronz; B15 bronz; B20 bronz; B8 bronz; Sárgaréz; Bronz (meghatározatlan); Újezüst (alpaka); Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
zh-CN: 镲片合金: B10 青铜; B12 青铜; B15 青铜; B20 青铜; B8 青铜; 黄铜; 青铜（未指定）; 镍银; 不锈钢; 其他
sv: Cymballegering: B10-brons; B12-brons; B15-brons; B20-brons; B8-brons; Mässing; Brons (ospecificerad); Nysilver; Rostfritt stål; Annat
cs: Slitina činelu: Bronz B10; Bronz B12; Bronz B15; Bronz B20; Bronz B8; Mosaz; Bronz (nespecifikovaný); Alpaka; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
bg-BG: Сплав на чинела: B10 бронз; B12 бронз; B15 бронз; B20 бронз; B8 бронз; Месинг; Бронз (неуточнен); Немско сребро; Неръждаема стомана; Други
de: Beckenlegierung: B10-Bronze; B12-Bronze; B15-Bronze; B20-Bronze; B8-Bronze; Messing; Bronze (nicht spezifiziert); Neusilber; Edelstahl; Sonstige
sl-SI: Zlitina za činele: Bron B10; Bron B12; Bron B15; Bron B20; Bron B8; Medenina; Bron (nedoločeno); Alpaka (nikljevo srebro); Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
ru: Сплав тарелок: Бронза B10; Бронза B12; Бронза B15; Бронза B20; Бронза B8; Латунь; Бронза (не указана); Нейзильбер; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
th: โลหะผสมฉาบ: บรอนซ์ B10; บรอนซ์ B12; บรอนซ์ B15; บรอนซ์ B20; บรอนซ์ B8; ทองเหลือง; บรอนซ์ (ไม่ระบุ); นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; สเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
vi: Hợp kim chũm chọe: Đồng B10; Đồng B12; Đồng B15; Đồng B20; Đồng B8; Đồng thau; Đồng (không xác định); Bạc niken; Thép không gỉ; Khác
zh-TW: 鈸合金: B10 銅; B12 銅; B15 銅; B20 銅; B8 銅; 黃銅; 銅 (未指定); 白銅; 不鏽鋼; 其他
ko: 심벌즈 합금: B10 브론즈; B12 브론즈; B15 브론즈; B20 브론즈; B8 브론즈; 브라스; 브론즈(미지정); 니켈 실버; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
nb: Cymballegering: B10-bronse; B12-bronse; B15-bronse; B20-bronse; B8-bronse; Messing; Bronse (uspesifisert); Nysølv; Rustfritt stål; Annet
en: Cymbal alloy: B10 bronze; B12 bronze; B15 bronze; B20 bronze; B8 bronze; Brass; Bronze (unspecified); Nickel silver; Stainless steel; Other
tr: Zil alaşımı: B10 bronz; B12 bronz; B15 bronz; B20 bronz; B8 bronz; Pirinç; Bronz (belirtilmemiş); Nikel gümüşü; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer